Utah statutes.
17-14-2.   Order in which relatives are liable.
Children shall first be called upon to support their parents, if they are of
sufficient ability; if there are none of sufficient ability, the parents of
such poor person shall be next called upon; if there are neither parents nor
children, the brothers and sisters shall next be called upon; and if there are
neither brothers nor sisters, the grandchildren of such poor person shall next
be called upon, and then the grandparents.
